AlienN.lexc
!Complete Template for Alienable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and optional possession (2) = 8 forms total

LEXICON Alienable
@U.TV.NO@@U.VERB.NO@ SetB ;
    ANsubclasses ;

LEXICON ANsubclasses
    Count ;
    Mass ;

LEXICON Count
huurak Endings ;
ts'oko Endings ;
miya Endings ;
peelo' Endings ;
xuxi Endings ;
kɨɨʃa Endings ;

LEXICON Mass
uy Endings ;
wati Endings ;
ɬɨwɨ Endings ;

LEXICON Endings
@U.DERIV.NO@ Number ;
@U.DERIV.YES@@U.DIM.NO@ IntransitiveDERIV ;
